Utah statutes.
17B-1-703.   Local districts to submit audit reports.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), within 30 days after it is
presented to the board, the board of each local district with an annual budget
of $50,000 or more shall send a copy of any audit report to:
(i)  each of its constituent entities that has in writing requested a copy;
and
(ii)  each of its customer agencies that has in writing requested a copy.
(b)  Within 30 days after it is presented to the board, the board of a public
transit district serving a population of more than 200,000 people shall send a
copy of its annual audit report to:
(i)  each of its constituent entities; and
(ii)  each of its customer agencies that has in writing requested a copy.
(2)  Each constituent entity and each customer agency that received the audit
report shall review the audit report submitted by the district and, if
necessary, request a meeting with the district board to discuss the audit
report.
(3)  At the meeting, the local district board shall:
(a)  answer any questions about the audit report; and
(b)  discuss their plans to implement suggestions made by the auditor.
